Ohio, session 136, SB156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3301.0717 and 3313.6025 of the 4
Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 3301.0717. (A) As used in this section, "success 6
sequence" means a three-pronged framework for youth and young 7
adults based on research from diverse institutions that 8
individuals who complete at least a high school education, 9
obtain full-time work, and marry before having children are 10
overwhelmingly less likely to live in poverty in adulthood. 11
(B) The department of education and workforce shall 12
develop standards and a model curriculum about the success 13
sequence for grades six to twelve, which shall include evidence, 14
identified using the best research methods available, describing 15
the positive personal and societal outcomes associated with the 16
success sequence. 17
(C) The department shall establish a committee including 18

S. B. No. 156 Page 2
As Passed by the Senate
school district board of education members and parents of 19
students enrolled in school districts to review the standards 20
and model curriculum, and instructional materials aligned with 21
them that may be used in annual success sequence discussions. 22
(D) The department may propose revisions to the success 23
sequence standards and model curriculum for review and comment 24
by educators, representatives of institutions of higher 25
education who have expertise in success sequence content, 26
business leaders, and other individuals. 27
(E) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to 28
administer this section. Any rules adopted shall be consistent 29
with evidence, identified using the best research methods 30
available, describing the positive personal and societal 31
outcomes of the success sequence. 32
Sec. 3313.6025. As used in this section, "success 33
sequence" has the same meaning as in section 3301.0717 of the 34
Revised Code. 35
Each school district board of education shall provide 36
instruction on the success sequence that is aligned with the 37
standards developed under section 3301.0717 of the Revised Code. 38
Each district shall include that instruction in one or more 39
courses offered under division (C) of section 3313.603 of the 40
Revised Code. Each district may use the model curriculum adopted 41
under section 3301.0717 of the Revised Code in providing that 42
instruction and may modify that curriculum as appropriate for 43
the district. 44
The department of education and workforce shall adopt 45
rules to administer this section. Any rules adopted shall be 46
consistent with evidence, identified using the best research 47

S. B. No. 156 Page 3
As Passed by the Senate
methods available, describing the positive personal and societal 48
outcomes of the success sequence. 49